Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.090

Powers of inferior judicial officers.

Every other judicial officer may, within the county, city, district, or precinct in which he or she is chosen:

(1) Exercise the powers mentioned in RCW 2.28.080 (1) through (3);

(2) Exercise any other power and perform any other duty conferred or imposed upon him or her by other statute.

[ 2011 c 336 s 41; 1891 c 54 s 9; RRS s 60.]